Arkansas, session 2025, HB1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Education - Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G077C MLK EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(2) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(3) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(4) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
*KMW006*
01/14/2025 3:58:46 PM KMW006

HB1123
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies
Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Education - Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission - Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $245,831
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 88,147
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 50,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $383,978

SECTION 3. EXTRA HELP - CASH. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Education - Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission - Cash for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: four (4) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Education, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Education -
Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

01/14/2025 3:58:46 PM KMW006

HB1123
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $15,900
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,299
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 67,924
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,000
(C) PROF. FEES 4,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $91,123

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
01/14/2025 3:58:46 PM KMW006

HB1123
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






























01/14/2025 3:58:46 PM KMW006